California, session 20252026, AB2662.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) On January 25, 2017, President Donald J. Trump signed Executive Order 13768, titled “Enhancing Public Safety in the Interior of the United States,” which expanded federal immigration enforcement priorities and broadened categories of individuals subject to removal.(b) In public statements during the 2024 presidential campaign and transition period, President-elect Donald J. Trump announced his intent to significantly increase immigration enforcement activity and prioritize removal of noncitizens with criminal convictions.(c) Immigration enforcement activities conducted in California communities have, at various times, generated widespread public concern and have affected community trust in public institutions, including schools, health facilities, and local government.(d) Federal immigration enforcement actions have, in some instances, resulted in litigation and judicial findings addressing alleged violations of constitutional protections, including due process rights and protections against unreasonable searches and seizures.(e) In January 2025, the United States Department of Homeland Security (DHS) announced changes to prior enforcement guidance regarding actions in “sensitive locations,” a policy framework that had limited enforcement activity in schools, health care facilities, and places of worship since 2011.(f) Media reports, court filings, and civil rights complaints have documented allegations of excessive use of force, unlawful detention, racial profiling, and mistaken detention of United States citizens and lawful residents in connection with immigration enforcement activities.(g) DHS has publicly stated that its officers face safety threats and operational risks during enforcement activities. In certain cases, courts have reviewed conflicting accounts regarding the legality of arrests and the use of force.(h) Federal immigration enforcement activity may have significant collateral impacts on United State citizens, lawful permanent residents, individuals with deferred action or pending immigration relief, and individuals complying with immigration court requirements.(i) Publicly available data regarding internal disciplinary actions, termination rates, or accountability measures for federal immigration officers is limited, making independent assessment of enforcement oversight challenging.(j) Community advocates and public health providers have reported that immigration enforcement activity near or within health facilities may deter individuals from seeking necessary medical care, raising public health concerns.(k) Business associations and local governments in certain California communities have reported workforce disruptions and decreased consumer activity following large-scale immigration enforcement operations.(l) Faith leaders and religious organizations have reported declines in attendance following changes to federal guidance regarding enforcement activity in places of worship.(m) DHS and its component agencies have, at various times, announced hiring initiatives to expand immigration enforcement personnel. Past federal hiring surges in border and immigration agencies have drawn scrutiny regarding training capacity, vetting procedures, and oversight mechanisms.(n) The United States Government Accountability Office (GAO) has previously reported that rapid hiring surges within federal border and immigration agencies were followed by increases in misconduct investigations, including corruption-related offenses.(o) Rapid expansion of enforcement personnel without proportional investment in training, supervision, and accountability safeguards may increase the risk of civil rights violations and undermine public trust.(p) Immigration enforcement operations conducted within California may affect relationships between local communities and local law enforcement agencies, particularly where residents perceive coordination or overlap in activities.(q) The State of California has a compelling interest in safeguarding the constitutional and civil rights of all persons within its jurisdiction and in ensuring transparency regarding the impacts of federal enforcement activities on its residents, institutions, and economy.SEC. 2. Chapter 17.35 (commencing with Section 7285.10) is added to Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, to read: CHAPTER 17.35. Working Group on Civil Rights Accountability7285.10. (a) On July 1, 2027, the Working Group on Civil Rights Accountability shall be established within the Department of Justice.(b) The purpose of the working group is to monitor, document, analyze, and report on alleged violations of constitutional and civil rights arising from immigration enforcement activities conducted within the state by federal agencies, including, but not limited to, United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE), United States Customs and Border Protection (CBP), the United States Border Patrol, the United States Department of Homeland Security (DHS), and the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI).(c) The working group shall provide recommendations to the Legislature and the Attorney General to strengthen oversight, improve data transparency, and protect the civil and constitutional rights of individuals and communities impacted by immigration enforcement activities.7285.12. (a) The working group shall consist of 12 members, appointed as follows:(1) Three members appointed by the Governor.(2) Three members appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.(3) Three members appointed by the President pro Tempore of the Senate.(4) Three members appointed by the Attorney General.(b) Each appointing authority shall ensure that its appointees collectively reflect expertise in constitutional law, civil rights enforcement, public accountability, labor and workforce impacts, public health, education, and community-based oversight.(c) Each member appointed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall possess demonstrated expertise in one or more of the following areas:(1) Constitutional law, civil rights litigation, or federal or state civil rights enforcement, including experience analyzing the Fourth Amendment, due process, or equal protection claims.(2) Monitoring, investigating, auditing, or documenting law enforcement activities, including experience with civilian oversight, police accountability, or governmental transparency mechanisms.(3) Immigration law or policy, including experience representing individuals in immigration proceedings or advising public agencies on immigration-related legal compliance.(4) Data collection, civil rights impact analysis, or public policy research related to law enforcement practices and their economic, educational, public health, or labor market impacts.(5) Direct service or advocacy work with communities disproportionately affected by immigration enforcement, including demonstrated, sustained engagement with immigrant communities.(6) Lived experience of immigration enforcement actions, including detention or arrest, coupled with demonstrated leadership, advocacy, or community engagement relevant to the purposes of this chapter.(d) A member shall serve a two-year term at the pleasure of their appointing authority.(e) The members of the working group shall elect a chair and vice chair from among its membership.7285.14. The working group shall meet at least quarterly.7285.16. (a) The working group shall develop and maintain a statewide reporting dashboard to document and categorize alleged constitutional or civil rights violations arising from federal immigration enforcement activities within the state.(b) The Department of Justice shall establish standards, submission protocols, and data verification procedures for nonprofit organizations authorized to submit reports to the dashboard. A nonprofit organization shall be eligible to submit reports to the dashboard if it meets all of the following qualifications:(1) Is incorporated as a nonprofit organization.(2) Holds state or federal tax-exempt status.(3) Demonstrates documented experience serving or representing communities affected by immigration enforcement.(4) Agrees to comply with data integrity, confidentiality, and privacy standards established by the Department of Justice.(c) The dashboard shall, at a minimum, include all of the following data fields:(1) Date of incident.(2) City and county in which the incident occurred.(3) Federal agency involved.(4) Category of alleged violation, including, but not limited to:(A) Excessive use of force.(B) Unlawful stop, search, arrest, or detention.(C) Enforcement actions in sensitive locations, including schools, religious institutions, health facilities, or courthouses.(D) Actions involving a United States citizen or lawful permanent resident.(E) Actions involving individuals with deferred action, pending immigration relief, or compliance with federal immigration proceedings.(F) Stops or questioning conducted without apparent lawful basis.(5) Whether related administrative complaints or litigation has been filed.(6) Links to publicly available news reports, audiovisual evidence, or court filings, if available.(7) Whether witnesses have indicated willingness to provide testimony.(d) The Beginning January 1, 2028, and on each January 1 thereafter, the working group shall submit an annual a report to the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795, and make the that annual report publicly available. The report shall summarize documented trends, geographic patterns, systemic concerns, and policy recommendations to safeguard constitutional and civil rights within the state.7285.17. The reports required pursuant to this chapter are exempt from the disclosure requirements of the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000)). SEC. 3. The Legislature finds and declares that Section 2 of this act, which adds Chapter 17.35 (commencing with Section 7285.10) to Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, imposes a limitation on the public’s right of access to the meetings of public bodies or the writings of public officials and agencies within the meaning of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution. Pursuant to that constitutional provision, the Legislature makes the following findings to demonstrate the interest protected by this limitation and the need for protecting that interest:It is in the best interest of the public to protect individual privacy and thus limit the disclosure of sensitive personal information contained in reports concerning constitutional or civil rights violations.